Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-502.04
Laboratory; test results; notification required.

Any person who is in charge of a clinical laboratory in which a laboratory examination of any specimen derived from the human body yields microscopical, cultural, immunological, serological, or other evidence of disease, illness, or poisoning as the Department of Health and Human Services may from time to time specify shall promptly notify the official local health department or the Department of Health and Human Services of such findings.

Each notification shall give the date and result of the test performed, the name and, when available, the age of the person from whom the specimen was obtained, and the name and address of the physician for whom such examination or test was performed. A legible copy of the laboratory report shall be deemed satisfactory notification.

Laws 1967, c. 447, § 2, p. 1391;

R.S.1943, (1986), § 71-1117;

Laws 1988, LB 1012, § 7;

Laws 1992, LB 1019, § 46;

Laws 1994, LB 819, § 2;

Laws 1996, LB 1044, § 492;

Laws 1997, LB 197, § 3;

Laws 2007, LB296, § 380.